California, session 20252026, SB585.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18781 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:18781. A livestock or poultry product is misbranded in each of the following cases:(a) Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.(b) It is offered for sale under the name of another food.(c) It is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation” and and, immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated.(d) Its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.